Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 13. State Election Campaigns.
Sec. 15.13.068.
Expenditures and contributions by foreign-influenced corporations and foreign nationals.

A foreign-influenced corporation or foreign national may not, directly or indirectly, in connection with an election under this chapter, make a contribution or expenditure or make an express or implied promise to make a contribution or expenditure.

The provisions of this section prohibit a foreign-influenced corporation or foreign national from making a contribution or expenditure in connection with a state election only to the extent

federal law prohibits the foreign-influenced corporation or foreign national from making a contribution or expenditure in connection with a state election; and

permitted by federal law.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a foreign-influenced corporation may make a contribution to a person who makes covered expenditures or contributions if that person segregates contributions from foreign nationals and foreign-influenced corporations into a separate bank account that may not be used, directly or indirectly, to finance covered expenditures or contributions.

In this section, when determining the percentage of a corporation’s shares outstanding or equity owned by two or more foreign nationals,

ownership in a mutual or pension fund that holds securities is not a form of ownership or control in such securities unless the foreign national or foreign owner can exercise control or participate in the management of the fund;

for privately held corporations, a corporation shall determine its percentage of foreign ownership at the time it obligates funds to make covered expenditures or contributions;

a publicly held corporation shall determine whether it is a foreign-influenced corporation based on its aggregate foreign ownership percentage at the close of trading on the last business day of the calendar quarter preceding the date the corporation makes or obligates funds to make a covered expenditure or contribution, unless the corporation has actual knowledge of its foreign ownership percentage at the time it makes or becomes obligated to make the covered expenditure or contribution; for the purposes of this paragraph, the corporation shall rely on facts, including information

in the corporation’s shareholder register;

in possession of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or another governmental agency that is available to the general public;

known to the corporation as a result of litigation, financing transactions, or proxies voted at annual or other meetings; and

known to the corporation from another source.

In this section,

“corporation” means any corporation, company, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, business association, or other similar entity;

“covered expenditure” means an independent expenditure, electioneering expenditure, or express communication, but does not include a media communication, membership communication, shareholder communication, or expenditure as defined in AS

15.13.400

;

“election” means any state or local election, including a special or runoff election;

“electioneering expenditure” means a purchase or transfer of, or a promise or agreement to purchase or transfer, money or a thing of value to enable or facilitate the broadcast or other distribution of a communication that

clearly refers to a candidate for an election under (B) of this paragraph;

occurs in a 60-day period immediately preceding a general, special, or runoff election or within the 30 days preceding a primary or preference election, or a convention or caucus of a political party legally permitted to nominate a candidate for an election under this chapter; and

may be received by 500 or more persons in the jurisdiction the candidate seeks to represent;

“foreign-influenced corporation” means a corporation for which

a foreign national or foreign owner holds, owns, controls, or has direct or indirect beneficial ownership of equity or voting shares in an amount equal to or greater than five percent of all corporate voting shares outstanding or all corporate equity;

two or more foreign nationals or foreign owners combined hold, own, control, or have direct or indirect beneficial ownership of equity or voting shares in an amount equal to or greater than 20 percent of all corporate voting shares outstanding or all corporate equity; or

a foreign national or foreign owner participates directly or indirectly in decisions relating to covered expenditures or contributions;

“foreign national” means

an individual who is not a United States citizen or lawfully admitted for permanent residence under 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(20);

a foreign government, every political subdivision of a foreign government, every official, agent, or representative of a foreign government, and every agency, corporation, or instrumentality of the foreign government or of a political subdivision of a foreign government;

a person outside of the United States, unless it is established that the person is an individual and a citizen of and domiciled in the United States, or that the person is not an individual and is organized under or created by the laws of the United States or of any state or other place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States and has its principal place of business in the United States; or

a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a foreign country;

“foreign owner” means a person for whom a foreign national holds, owns, controls, or otherwise has directly or indirectly acquired beneficial ownership of equity or voting shares in a corporation in an amount equal to or greater than 50 percent of all corporate voting shares outstanding or all corporate equity;

“media communication” means a communication

in a news story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the facilities of a radio station, television station, cable television system, or satellite system, newspaper, magazine, or other periodical publication, unless the facilities are owned or controlled by a political party, political committee, or candidate; or

that constitutes a public debate or forum that includes at least two opposing candidates for an office or one advocate and one opponent of an issue, or that solely promotes such a debate or forum and is made by or on behalf of the person sponsoring the debate or forum, provided that the staging organization

is a charitable organization that does not make other covered expenditures and does not otherwise support or oppose any political candidate, political party, ballot propositions or questions, or initiative proposals or is a newspaper, radio station, television station, cable television system, or satellite system, newspaper, magazine, or other periodical publication, or other recognized news medium; and

does not structure the debate to promote or advance one candidate or issue position over another;

“membership communication” means a direct and private communication between a membership organization or union and one or more members of the organization or union, if the membership organization or union

has members with authority to administer the membership organization or union;

expressly states the qualifications and requirements for membership in articles, bylaws, or other formal organizational documents; and

is not organized primarily for the purpose of making covered expenditures or influencing elections, ballot propositions, ballot questions, or ballot initiative proposals;

“shareholder communication” means a direct and private communication between a corporation and shareholders, executives, or administrative personnel of the corporation.

History.

(§ 10 ch 36 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 2 ch 61 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 2010 and 2018 to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. In 2018, subsections (c) and (d) were enacted as (d) and (e), at which time existing subsection (c) was relettered as (e).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, in (a), inserted “foreign-influenced corporations or” preceding “foreign national” or similar, three times, added (c)(1) — (5), (7) — (10), and made related and stylistic changes; added (d) and (e) [now (c) and (d)]. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor's notes. —

For provision relating to the severability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 15, ch. 61, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An initiative petition, known as 17 AKGA, was certified by the Lieutenant Governor to appear on the November 2018 ballot; it related broadly to campaign finance, public official integrity, and good governance. During the legislative session the legislature enacted HB 44 (Chapter 61, SLA 2018), similarly relating, inter alia, to campaign expenditures and contributions, the legislators' per diem, gifts by lobbyists, and voting or other actions by a legislator where the legislator had a conflict of interest. Under
AS

15.45.210

, where an act of the legislature is substantially the same as a petition, is enacted after the petition has been filed and before the date of the election, the petition is void. Following the passage of HB 44, the Lieutenant Governor determined, and the Attorney General agreed, that the initiative petition known as 17 AKGA, and HB 44, were substantially the same, rendering 17 AKGA void and ineligible to appear on the ballot. 2018 Op. Alaska Att'y Gen. (May 25).

Sec. 15.13.069.
Certain expenditures that comply with charitable gaming provisions permitted.

Notwithstanding another provision of this title, a charitable gaming permittee that is a qualified organization under AS

05.15.690

may use the net proceeds of a raffle or lottery to make expenditures for the purposes permitted under AS

05.15.150(a)(3)

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Sec. 15.13.070.
Limitations on amount of political contributions.

An individual or group may make contributions, subject only to the limitations of this chapter and AS 24.45, including the limitations on the maximum amounts set out in this section.

An individual may contribute not more than

$500 per year to a nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of a candidate, to a candidate, to an individual who conducts a write-in campaign as a candidate, or to a group that is not a political party;

$5,000 per year to a political party.

A group that is not a political party may contribute not more than $1,000 per year

to a candidate, or to an individual who conducts a write-in campaign as a candidate;

to another group, to a nongroup entity, or to a political party.

A political party may contribute to a candidate, or to an individual who conducts a write-in campaign, for the following offices an amount not to exceed

$100,000 per year, if the election is for governor or lieutenant governor;

$15,000 per year, if the election is for the state senate;

$10,000 per year, if the election is for the state house of representatives; and

$5,000 per year, if the election is for

delegate to a constitutional convention;

judge seeking retention; or

municipal office.

This section does not prohibit a candidate from using up to a total of $1,000 from campaign contributions in a year to pay the cost of

attendance by a candidate or guests of the candidate at an event or other function sponsored by a political party or by a subordinate unit of a political party;

membership in a political party, subordinate unit of a political party, or other entity within a political party, or subscription to a publication from a political party; or

co-sponsorship of an event or other function sponsored by a political party or by a subordinate unit of a political party.

A nongroup entity may contribute not more than $1,000 a year to another nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of a candidate, to a candidate, to an individual who conducts a write-in campaign as a candidate, to a group, or to a political party.

Where contributions are made to a joint campaign for governor and lieutenant governor,

an individual may contribute not more than $1,000 per year; and

a group may contribute not more than $2,000 per year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am §§ 20, 21 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 45 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1998; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 2002; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 108 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 1; § 8, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Cross references. —

For prohibition against certain campaign fund-raising by legislators, see AS

24.60.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, added (g).

Opinions of attorney general. —

There seems to be no difference between § 608(c) of the Federal Elections Campaign Act of 1971, former 18 U.S.C. § 608(c), and subsection (f) of this section; accordingly, based on the reasons stated in
Buckley v. Valeo, 424 U.S. 1, 96 S. Ct. 612, 46 L.
Ed. 2d 659 (1976), for finding unconstitutional § 608(c) of the federal act, subsection (f) of this section is invalid as a violation of the rights and privileges protected by the 1st amendment.
May 13, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen (decided prior to the 1986 repeal of former subsection (f)).

The Public Offices Commission should not undertake investigations of violations of subsection (f) of this section, and candidates or others may be advised that no implementation or enforcement of subsection (f) of this section is planned by the office of the attorney general.
May 13, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen. (decided prior to the 1986 repeal of former subsection (f)).

The $1000 statutory limit under this section is applicable to “control groups” under former AS

15.13.130

(4).
Exempting such groups from the contribution limit would seriously undermine the statute’s primary purpose of deterring the buying of elections and the undue influence of large contributors.
June 15, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 15.13.072.
Restrictions on solicitation and acceptance of contributions.

A candidate or an individual who has filed with the commission the document necessary to permit that individual to incur election-related expenses under AS

15.13.100

may not solicit or accept a contribution from

a person not authorized by law to make a contribution;

an individual who is not a resident of the state at the time the contribution is made, except as provided in (e) of this section;

a group organized under the laws of another state, resident in another state, or whose participants are not residents of this state at the time the contribution is made; or

a person registered as a lobbyist if the contribution violates AS

15.13.074(g)

or AS

24.45.121(a)(8)

.

A candidate or an individual who has filed with the commission the document necessary to permit the individual to incur election-related expenses under AS

15.13.100

, or a group, may not solicit or accept a cash contribution that exceeds $100.

An individual, or one acting directly or indirectly on behalf of that individual, may not solicit or accept a contribution

before the date for which contributions may be made as determined under AS

15.13.074(c)

; or

later than the day after which contributions may not be made as determined under AS

15.13.074(c)

.

While the legislature is convened in a regular or special legislative session, a legislator or legislative employee may not solicit or accept a contribution to be used for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election under this chapter unless

it is an election in which the legislator or legislative employee is a candidate and the contribution is for that legislator’s or legislative employee’s campaign;

the solicitation or acceptance occurs during the 90 days immediately preceding that election; and

the solicitation or acceptance occurs in a place other than the capital city or a municipality in which the legislature is convened in special session if the legislature is convened in a municipality other than the capital city.

A candidate or an individual who has filed with the commission the document necessary to permit that individual to incur election-related expenses under AS

15.13.100

may solicit or accept contributions from an individual who is not a resident of the state at the time the contribution is made if the amounts contributed by individuals who are not residents do not exceed

$20,000 a calendar year, if the candidate or individual is seeking the office of governor or lieutenant governor;

$5,000 a calendar year, if the candidate or individual is seeking the office of state senator;

$3,000 a calendar year, if the candidate or individual is seeking the office of state representative or municipal or other office.

A group or political party may solicit or accept contributions from an individual who is not a resident of the state at the time the contribution is made, but the amounts accepted from individuals who are not residents may not exceed 10 percent of total contributions made to the group or political party during the calendar or group year in which the contributions are received.

A candidate or an individual who has filed with the commission the document necessary to permit that individual to incur election-related expenses under AS

15.13.100

for election or reelection to the office of governor or lieutenant governor may not solicit or accept a contribution in the capital city while the legislature is convened in a regular or special legislative session.

A nongroup entity may solicit or accept contributions for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of a candidate from an individual who is not a resident of the state at the time the contribution is made or from an entity organized under the laws of another state, resident in another state, or whose participants are not residents of this state at the time the contribution is made. The amounts accepted by the nongroup entity from these individuals and entities for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of a candidate may not exceed 10 percent of total contributions made to the nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of a candidate during the calendar year in which the contributions are received.

History.

(§ 11 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 12 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 11 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.074.
Prohibited contributions.

A person, group, or nongroup entity may not make a contribution if the making of the contribution would violate this chapter.

A person or group may not make a contribution anonymously, using a fictitious name, or using the name of another. Individuals, persons, nongroup entities, or groups subject to AS

15.13.040(r)

may not contribute or accept $2,000 or more of dark money as that term is defined in AS

15.13.400

(5), and may not make a contribution while acting as an intermediary without disclosing the true source of the contribution as defined in AS

15.13.400

(19).

A person or group may not make a contribution

to a candidate or an individual who files with the commission the document necessary to permit that individual to incur certain election-related expenses as authorized by AS

15.13.100

when the office is to be filled at a general election before the date that is 18 months before the general election;

to a candidate or an individual who files with the commission the document necessary to permit that individual to incur certain election-related expenses as authorized by AS

15.13.100

for an office that is to be filled at a special election or municipal election before the date that is 18 months before the date of the regular municipal election or that is before the date of the proclamation of the special election at which the candidate or individual seeks election to public office; or

to any candidate later than the 45th day

after the date of the primary or special primary election if the candidate was not chosen to appear on the general or special election ballot at the primary or special primary election; or

after the date of the general or special election, or after the date of a municipal or municipal runoff election.

A person or group may not make a contribution to a candidate or a person or group who is prohibited by AS

15.13.072(c)

from accepting it.

A person or group may not make a cash contribution that exceeds $100.

A corporation, company, partnership, firm, association, entity recognized as tax-exempt under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code), organization, business trust or surety, labor union, or publicly funded entity that does not satisfy the definition of group or nongroup entity in AS

15.13.400

may not make a contribution to a candidate, group, or nongroup entity.

An individual required to register as a lobbyist under AS 24.45 may not make a contribution to a candidate for the legislature at any time the individual is subject to the registration requirement under AS 24.45 and for one year after the date of the individual’s initial registration or its renewal. However, the individual may make a contribution under this section to a candidate for the legislature in a district in which the individual is eligible to vote or will be eligible to vote on the date of the election. An individual who is subject to the restrictions of this subsection shall report to the commission, on a form provided by the commission, each contribution made while required to register as a lobbyist under AS 24.45. Upon request of the commission, the information required under this subsection shall be submitted electronically. This subsection does not apply to a representational lobbyist as defined in regulations of the commission.

Notwithstanding AS

15.13.070

, a candidate for governor or lieutenant governor and a group that is not a political party and that, under the definition of the term “group,” is presumed to be controlled by a candidate for governor or lieutenant governor, may not make a contribution to a candidate for another office, to a person who conducts a write-in campaign as a candidate for other office, or to another group of amounts received by that candidate or controlled group as contributions between January 1 and the date of the general election of the year of a general election for an election for governor and lieutenant governor. This subsection does not prohibit

the group described in this subsection from making contributions to the candidates for governor and lieutenant governor whom the group supports; or

the governor or lieutenant governor, or the group described in this subsection, from making contributions under AS

15.13.116(a)(2)(A)

.

A nongroup entity may not solicit or accept a contribution to be used for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election unless the potential contributor is notified that the contribution may be used for that purpose.

History.

(§ 11 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 14 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch 33 SLA 1999; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 1 SLA 2002; am §§ 12, 13 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 6 ch 73 SLA 2013; §§ 9 and 10, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendment to (c) of this section made by § 12, ch. 48, SLA 1996 took effect July 16, 1999 under §§ 33(b) and 34, ch. 48, SLA 1996.
The contingency described in § 33(b), ch. 48, SLA 1996 occurred 90 days after the date of the decision in State of Alaska v. Alaska Civil Liberties Union,
978 P.2d 597 (Alaska Opin. No. 5108, April 16, 1999). The 90 day period represents the time during which a petition for certiorari could have been filed with the U.S. Supreme Court.
The State did not file a petition for certiorari, and therefore that part of the decision declaring AS

15.13.074(c)

(as enacted in § 11, ch. 48, SLA 1996) unconstitutional became final at the close of business July 15, 1999.
Under § 34, ch. 48, SLA 1996, the amendment to (c) of this section made by § 12, ch. 48, SLA 1996, became effective the next day, July 16, 1999. Because it appeared to the revisor that the intervening amendments made to subsection (c) by § 2, ch. 14, SLA 1998 and § 5, ch. 74, SLA 1998 were inconsistent with the repeal and reenactment of subsection (c) under § 12, ch. 48, SLA 1996, those 1998 amendments were not retained.

In 2020, in subsection (b), “ AS

15.13.040(r)

” was substituted for “ AS

15.13.040(s)

”, “ AS

15.13.400

(5)” was substituted for “ AS

15.13.400

(17)”, and “ AS 15.13.400(19)” was substituted for “ AS 15.13.400(18)” to reflect the relettering and renumbering in that section.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (c)(3)(A), inserted “on the ballot and was” following “if the candidate was”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (b), added the second sentence; rewrote (c)(3)(A), which read, “after the date of the primary election if the candidate was on the ballot and was not nominated at the primary election; or”, and in (c)(3)(B), inserted “or special” following “the general”.

Sec. 15.13.076.
Authorized recipients of contributions.

A contribution to a

candidate may be received only by

the candidate; or

the candidate’s campaign treasurer or a deputy campaign treasurer;

group may be received only by the group’s campaign treasurer or a deputy treasurer.

History.

(§ 11 ch 48 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.078.
Contributions and loans from the candidate.

The provisions of this chapter do not prohibit the individual who is a candidate from giving any amount of the candidate’s own money or other thing of value to the campaign of the candidate. Donations made by the candidate to the candidate’s own campaign shall be reported as contributions in accordance with AS

15.13.040

and

15.13.110

.

The provisions of this chapter do not prohibit the individual who is a candidate from lending any amount to the campaign of the candidate. Loans made by the candidate shall be reported as contributions in accordance with AS

15.13.040

and

15.13.110

. However, the candidate may not

recover, under this section and AS

15.13.116(a)(4)

, the amount of a loan made by the candidate to the candidate’s own campaign that exceeds

$25,000, if the candidate ran for governor or lieutenant governor;

$10,000, if the candidate ran for

the legislature; or

delegate to a constitutional convention;

$10,000, if the candidate was a judge seeking retention;

$5,000, if the candidate ran in a municipal election; or

repay a loan that the candidate has made to the candidate’s own campaign unless, within five days of making the loan, the candidate notifies the commission, on a form provided by the commission, of the candidate’s intention to repay the loan under AS

15.13.116(a)(4)

.

On and after the date determined under AS

15.13.110

as the last day of the period ending three days before the due date of the report required to be filed under AS

15.13.110(a)(1)

and until the date of the election for which the report is filed, a candidate may not give or loan to the candidate’s campaign the candidate’s money or other thing of value of the candidate in an amount that exceeds $5,000.

The provisions of this section apply only to the individual who is a candidate, as that term is defined by AS

15.13.400

(1)(A), and do not apply to authorize a contribution or loan under this section by an individual described in the definition of the term “candidate” under AS

15.13.400

(1)(B).

History.

(§ 11 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 33 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.080.
Statement by or on behalf of contributor. [Repealed, § 11 ch 1 TSSLA 2002.]

Sec. 15.13.082.
Limitations on expenditures.

A candidate or group may not make an expenditure in cash that exceeds $100 unless the candidate, or the campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer, obtains a written receipt from the person to whom the expenditure is made.

A person, other than an individual exempt from reporting under AS

15.13.040(h)

, may not make an expenditure unless the source of the expenditure has been disclosed as required by this chapter.

If a candidate receives a contribution in the form of cash, check, money order, or other negotiable instrument and is subject to being reported to the commission under this chapter, the candidate may neither expend the contribution nor, in the case of a negotiable instrument, convert it to cash unless the candidate, campaign treasurer, or deputy campaign treasurer first records the following information for disclosure to the commission:

the name, address, principal occupation, and employer of the contributor; and

the date and amount of the contribution.

History.

(§ 14 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 16 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 11 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Sec. 15.13.084.
Prohibited expenditures.

A person may not make an expenditure

anonymously, unless the expenditure is

paid for by an individual acting independently of any person;

made to influence the outcome of a ballot proposition as that term is defined by AS

15.13.065(c)

; and

made for

a billboard or sign; or

printed material, other than an advertisement made in a newspaper or other periodical;

using a fictitious name or using the name of another.

History.

(§ 14 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 17 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 12 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.086.
Authorized makers of expenditures.

An expenditure

authorized by or in behalf of a candidate may be made only by

the candidate; or

the candidate’s campaign treasurer or a deputy campaign treasurer;

authorized by AS

15.13.067

(3) by or in behalf of a group may be made only by the group’s campaign treasurer.

History.

(§ 14 ch 48 SLA 1996)

Sec. 15.13.090.
Identification of communication.

All communications shall be clearly identified by the words “paid for by” followed by the name and address of the person paying for the communication. In addition, except as provided by (d) of this section, a person shall clearly

provide the person’s address or the person’s principal place of business;

for a person other than an individual or candidate, include

the name and title of the person’s principal officer;

a statement from the principal officer approving the communication; and

unless the person is a political party, identification of the name and city and state of residence or principal place of business, as applicable, of each of the person’s three largest contributors under AS

15.13.040(e)(5)

, if any, during the 12-month period before the date of the communication.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply when the communication

is paid for by an individual acting independently of any other person;

is made to influence the outcome of a ballot proposition as that term is defined by AS

15.13.065(c)

; and

is made for

a billboard or sign; or

printed material other than an advertisement made in a newspaper or other periodical.

To satisfy the requirements of (a)(1) of this section and, if applicable, (a)(2)(C) of this section, a communication that includes a print or video component must have the following statement or statements placed in the communication so as to be easily discernible, and, in a broadcast, cable, satellite, Internet or other digital communication, the statement must remain onscreen throughout the entirety of the communication; the second statement is not required if the person paying for the communication has no contributors or is a political party:

Notwithstanding the requirements of (a) of this section, in a communication transmitted through radio or other audio media and in a communication that includes an audio component, the following statements must be read in a manner that is easily heard; the second statement is not required if the person paying for the communication has no contributors or is a political party:

Contributors required to be identified under (a)(2)(C) of this section must be listed in order of the amount of their contributions. If more than three of the largest contributors to a person paying for a communication contribute equal amounts, the person may select which of the contributors of equal amounts to identify under (a)(2)(C) of this section. In no case shall a person be required to identify more than three contributors under (a)(2)(C) of this section.

The provisions of this subsection apply to a person who makes an independent expenditure for a communication described in (a) of this section. If the person paying for the communication is not a natural person, the provisions also apply to the responsible officer or officers of the corporation, company, partnership, firm, association, organization, labor organization, business trust, or society who approve the independent expenditure for the communication. A person who makes a communication under this subsection may not, with actual malice, include within or as a part of the communication a false statement of material fact about a candidate for election to public office that constitutes defamation of the candidate. For purposes of this subsection, a statement constitutes defamation of the candidate if the statement

exposes the candidate to strong disapproval, contempt, ridicule, or reproach; or

tends to deprive the candidate of the benefit of public confidence.

To satisfy the requirements of (a)(1) of this section and, if applicable, (a)(2)(C) of this section, a communication paid for by an outside-funded entity as that term is defined in AS

15.13.400

(15) that includes a print or video component must have the following statement placed in the communication so as to be easily discernible, and, in a broadcast, cable, satellite, Internet or other digital communication, the statement must remain onscreen throughout the entirety of the communication; the statement is not required if the outside entity paying for the communication has no contributors or is a political party: “A MAJORITY OF CONTRIBUTIONS TO (OUTSIDE-FUNDED ENTITY'S NAME) CAME FROM OUTSIDE THE STATE OF ALASKA.”

This communication was paid for by (person’s name and city and state of principal place of business). The top contributors of (person’s name) are (the name and city and state of residence or principal place of business, as applicable, of the largest contributors to the person under ). AS

15.13.090(a)(2)(C)

Click to view

This communication was paid for by (person’s name). The top contributors of (person’s name) are (the name of the largest contributors to the person under ). AS

15.13.090(a)(2)(C)

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 22 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 36 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 48 SLA 1996; am §§ 18, 19 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 1 TSSLA 2002; am §§ 13, 14 ch 36 SLA 2010; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 73 SLA 2013; §§ 11 and 12, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2020, in subsection (g), “ AS

15.13.400

(15)” was substituted for “ AS

15.13.400

(19) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (a)(2)(C), added “unless the person is a political party,” at the beginning; in (c), inserted “; the second statement is not required if the person paying for the communication has no contributors or is a political party” following “easily discernible”; in (d), inserted “or is a political party” following “no contributors”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (c), inserted “, and, in a broadcast, cable, satellite, Internet or other digital communication, the statement must remain onscreen throughout the entirety of the communication” following “easily discernible”; added (g).

Sec. 15.13.095.
False statements in telephone polling and calls to convince.

A candidate who is damaged as the result of a false statement about the candidate made with knowledge that it was false, or with reckless disregard for whether it was false or not, made as part of a telephone poll or an organized series of calls, and made with the intent to convince potential voters concerning the outcome of an election in which the candidate is running may recover damages in an action in superior court under this section against the individual who made the telephone call, the individual’s employer, and the person who contracted for or authorized the poll or calls to convince. However, the employer of the individual or the person who contracted for or authorized the poll or calls to convince is liable to the defamed candidate only if the employer or person authorized the statement to be made, knowing that it was false or with reckless disregard for whether it was false or not, as part of the poll or calls to convince.

The court may award damages, including punitive damages. If the court finds that the result of the statement places the integrity of the election process in substantial doubt, the eligibility of the successful candidate to hold the office to which elected shall be determined as provided in AS

15.56.110(b)

or, in the case of a candidate for governor or lieutenant governor, by impeachment under art. II, sec. 20, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 142 SLA 1996)

Sec. 15.13.100.
Expenditures before filing.

A political campaign expenditure may not be made or incurred by a person in an election or by a person or group with the person’s knowledge and on the person’s behalf before the date upon which the person files for nomination for the office which the person seeks, except for personal travel expenses or for opinion surveys or polls.
These expenditures must be included in the first report required under this chapter after filing for office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 23 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 25 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.